Rhode Island statutes. Title 40.1 Behavioral Healthcare, Developmental Disabilities and Hospitals
Chapter 25 Protection and Advocacy System — Right of Access

40.1-25-1.
Right of access.

Any facility rendering care or treatment to a mentally ill individual as defined in §

40.1-25-2

shall permit the protection and advocacy system established by 42 U.S.C. § 10801 et seq., and its designees as certified by that agency, whose purposes include rendering assistance without charge to mentally ill individuals to have access to a facility in order to:

Communicate privately by mail or orally with any person in treatment.

Inspect all records relating to persons in treatment, provided that the person in treatment, or his or her guardian, gives written permission.

Take whatever steps are appropriate, including posting notice, to see that persons are made aware of the services of the protection and advocacy system, its purpose, and how it can be contacted. Officials in charge of each facility shall cooperate with the protection and advocacy system in this respect.

Take action it deems appropriate to protect the rights of those criminally insane patients included within the forensic unit of the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals and those previously considered to be within the authority of the Interstate Compact on the Mentally Disordered Offender.

Have access to policies, rules, and regulations affecting care, rights, or responsibilities of individuals residing therein.

Investigate incidents of abuse and neglect of mentally ill individuals if incidents are reported to the system or if there is probable cause to believe the incidents occurred.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 275, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 142.

40.1-25-2.
Definitions.

“Facility rendering care or treatment” means and includes, but is not limited to, public and private hospitals, community residences as defined by §

40.1-24.5-1

, shelter-care facilities, board-and-care facilities, group homes, nursing homes, and other congregate living facilities for mentally ill individuals.

“Mentally ill individual” means an individual:

Who has a significant mental illness or emotional impairment, as determined by a mental health professional qualified under the laws and regulations of the state; and

Who is an inpatient or resident in a facility as defined in subsection (a).

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 275, § 1.

40.1-25-3.
Penalties.

Any facility that violates the requirements of this chapter shall be guilty of a misdemeanor for the violation, punishable by a fine of up to five hundred dollars ($500) and/or six (6) months in jail.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 275, § 1.